Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6120
Rules and regulations; orders.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders to carry out the Insurers Demutualization Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 60;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 18.